Utah statutes.
13-46-201.   Creation.

(1) (a)  There is created within the department the Independent Contractor Enforcement Council consisting of the following four members:

(i)  the executive director of the department or the executive director's designee;

(ii)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services or the executive director's designee;

(iii)  the commissioner of the Labor Commission or the commissioner's designee; and

(iv)  the chief information officer of the Department of Technology Services.

(b)  The following shall work cooperatively with the council:

(i)  the Department of Public Safety; and

(ii)  the State Tax Commission.

(2)  The executive director of the department is chair of the council.

(3) (a)  A majority of the council members constitutes a quorum.

(b)  A vote of the majority of the council members present when a quorum is present is an action of the council.

(4)  The council shall meet at the call of the chair, except that the chair shall call a meeting at least quarterly.

(5)  The department shall staff the council.

